Maryland, session 2026, HB0991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
22–102.
This title applies only in Harford County.
22–1004.
(a) There is:
(1) a 6–day Class HC (health club) beer and wine license; and
(2) a 7–day Class HC (health club) beer and wine license.
(b) The Board may issue the 6–day or the 7–day license to a person who:
(1) sells health club services, as defined in § 14–12B–01 of the Commercial
Law Article;
– 1 –

Ch. 842 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) has a health club facility that offers:
(i) an indoor or outdoor swimming pool; or
(ii) pickleball courts;
(3) has at least 150 members who pay dues; and
(4) owns or leases real property in the county for use as a for–profit or
nonprofit health club facility.
(c) (1) The 6–day license authorizes the license holder to sell beer and wine
from Monday through Saturday in a bar area at a swimming pool or an indoor lounge or
both.
(2) The 7–day license authorizes the license holder to sell beer and wine
from Monday through Sunday in a bar area at a swimming pool or an indoor lounge or both.
(d) The 6–day license holder and the 7–day license holder may sell beer and wine
for on–premises consumption from 1 p.m. to [9 p.m.] 11 P.M.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –